src/conjunction-smj-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2 
! or any later version.

! Conjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Conjunction

 de		Cc ; ! (Pcle only, "så".) we do like in sme, vrd. Nickel
ja		Cc ;
jali		Cc ;
jale Cc ;
ge		Cc ;
goappátja	Cc ;
jalik		Cc ;
juobi	Cc ;
juogu		Cc ;
men		Cc ;
vaj		Cc ;
valla		Cc ;
masku Cc ;
val         Cc ;
vájbi		Cc ;
váj         Cc ;
mavas Cc ;

LEXICON Cc
+CC:%>0 # ;
